District of Columbia statutes.
47-2010

Presumption of taxability.

It shall be presumed that all receipts from the sale of tangible personal property and services mentioned in this chapter are subject to tax until the contrary is established, and the burden of proving that a receipt is not taxable hereunder shall be upon the vendor or the purchaser as the case may be. Except as provided in § 47-2005(3), unless the vendor shall have taken from the purchaser a certificate signed by and bearing the name and address of the purchaser and the number of his registration certificate to the effect that the property or service was purchased for resale or the property or service is exempt under § 47-2005, the receipts from all sales shall be deemed taxable. The certificate herein required shall be in such form as the Mayor shall prescribe and, in case no certificate is furnished or obtained prior to the time the sale is consummated, the tax shall apply to the gross receipts therefrom as if the sale were made at retail.

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 117, ch. 146, title I, § 130
July 24, 1982, D.C. Law 4-131, § 223, 29 DCR 2418
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 102(d), 48 DCR 334
Compensating-use tax, collection of tax by vendor, see § 47-2203.
Compensating-use tax, nonresident vendors, see § 47-2204.
This section is referenced in § 47-2203 and § 47-2204.
1981 Ed., § 47-2010.
1973 Ed., § 47-2607.
D.C. Law 13-305, in the second sentence, substituted “the property or service was purchased for resale or the property or service is exempt under 47-2005,” for “the property or service was purchased for resale,”.
Section 103 of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Sec. 103. Applicability. Section 102(a) through (c) shall apply beginning April 1, 2001. Section 102(d) shall apply beginning October 1, 2001.”